src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON св_4b?_буд._1_ед._затрудн.
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_1_ед._затрудн. ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end_1_ед._затрудн. ;

LEXICON св-нсв_4b
нсв_4b ;
св_4b ;

LEXICON св_4b[8]
св_нп_4b ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON св_4b[8]_Impи
св_нп_4b_Impи ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end_Impи ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON св_4b_R
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_R ;

LEXICON св_4b_R_Impи
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_R_Impи ;

LEXICON св_4b_R_буд._1_ед._затрудн.
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_R_1_ед._затрудн. ;

LEXICON св_нп_4b
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_4b_Impи
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_Impи ;

LEXICON св_нп_4b_буд._1_ед._затрудн.
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_1_ед._затрудн. ;

LEXICON св_4b_прич._страд._-жд-
:д св_нп_4b ;
+V+Perf+TV:ди́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:д Perf_Fut_2_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ждё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_4b_здить_прич._страд._-жд-
:зд св_нп_4b ;
+V+Perf+TV:зди́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:зд Perf_Fut_2_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ждё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_4b_буд._1_ед._затрудн.
: св_нп_4b_буд._1_ед._затрудн. ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end_1_ед._затрудн. ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_4b_(-щ-)
св_нп_4b_(-щ-) ;
+V+Perf+TV:ти́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end_(-щ-) ;
+V+Perf+TV:щё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св_4b_(-щ-)_R
+V+Perf+IV:ти́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_(-щ-)_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_4b_(-щ-)
+V+Perf+IV:ти́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_(-щ-) ;

LEXICON св_4b8
св_нп_4b ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;
! +V+Perf+TV+PstPss:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4b8_Impи
св_нп_4b_Impи ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end_Impи ;
! +V+Perf+TV+PstPss:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св-нсв_4b/c_(в_св)_и_4b_(в_нсв) ! родить
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_end ;
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON св-нсв_4b/c''_(прош._м_роди/лся/)_(в_св)_и_4b_(в_нсв)_R
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_end_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_shift''_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_4c
нсв_нп_4c ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ PresPass_Ant ;

LEXICON нсв_4c_Impи
нсв_нп_4c_Impи ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_w/Pass_Impи ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ PresPass_Ant ;

LEXICON нсв_4c_R
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_R ;

LEXICON нсв_4c_R_Impи
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_R_Impи ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4c
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4c_Impи
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift_Impи ;

LEXICON нсв_4c4
нсв_нп_4c4 ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_shift4_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:и PresPass_Ant ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4c4
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift4 ;

LEXICON нсв_4c4_R
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift4_R ;

LEXICON нсв_4c47
нсв_4c4 ;
+V+Impf+TV:ё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON нсв_4c[4]
нсв_нп_4c[4] ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_2_shift[4]_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:и PresPass_Ant ;

LEXICON нсв_4c[4]s
нсв_4c[4] ;
+V+Impf+TV:е PastPass_нн_end_Prb ;

LEXICON нсв_4c[4]7
нсв_4c[4] ;
+V+Impf+TV:ё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_4c[4]
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift[4] ;

LEXICON нсв_4c[4]_R
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_2_shift[4]_R ;

LEXICON нсв_4c7
нсв_4c ;
+V+Impf+TV:ё PastPass_нн_end ;

LEXICON нсв_4c[7]
нсв_4c ;
+V+Impf+TV:ё PastPass_нн_end_Fac ;

LEXICON св_4c
св_4c? ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4c_Impи
св_4c?_Impи ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4c?
св_нп_4c ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_shift ;

LEXICON св_4c?_Impи
св_нп_4c_Impи ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_shift_Impи ;

LEXICON св_4c7
св_нп_4c ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4c7_(-щ-)
+V+Perf+IV:ти́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_shift_(-щ-) ;
+V+Perf+TV:ти́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_shift_(-щ-) ;
+V+Perf+TV:щё PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св-нсв_4c7
нсв_4c7 ;
св_4c7 ;

LEXICON св_4c7_прич._страд._-жд-
:д св_нп_4c ;
+V+Perf+TV:ди́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:д Perf_Fut_2_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:ждё PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4c[7]
св_нп_4c ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_stem_Fac ;

LEXICON св_4c_R
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_shift_R ;

LEXICON св_4c_R_Impи
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_shift_R_Impи ;

LEXICON св_4c_(-щ-)_R
+V+Perf+IV:ти́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_shift_(-щ-)_R ;

LEXICON св-нсв_4c_R
нсв_4c_R ;
св_4c_R ;

LEXICON св_4c_R_буд._1_ед._затрудн.
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_shift_R_1SgPrb ;

LEXICON св_нп_4c
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_shift ;

LEXICON св_нп_4c_Impи
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_2_shift_Impи ;

LEXICON св-нсв_4c4
нсв_4c4 ;
св_4c ;

LEXICON св-нсв_4c4_R
нсв_4c4_R ;
св_4c_R ;

LEXICON нсв_4c_15
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_shift ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_shift ;
+V+Impf+TV:и́ PresPass ;

LEXICON нсв_4c_15_R
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_shift_R ;

LEXICON св_4c_15 ! -стелить
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:е PastPass_нн_stem ;

LEXICON св_4c_15_R ! -стелиться
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_shift_R ;

!- - - - - - - Stem type 4 Lexicalized participial forms- - - - - - - 

LEXICON св-нсв_4a_Lxc
нсв_4a_Lxc ;
св_4a_Lxc ;

LEXICON нсв_4a_Lxc
нсв_4a?_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_4a_Lxc
св_нп_4a_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_4a7_Lxc
: св_нп_4a_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_4a[2]_Lxc
св_нп_4a[2]_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem[2] ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_4a[3][7]_Lxc
св_4a[3]_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_stem_Fac_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_4a[3]_Lxc
св_нп_4a[3]_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_stem[3] ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_4a_-мучить_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:му́чи Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:му́ч Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:муча́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:му́чи Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:му́ч Perf_Fut_2_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:муча́ Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:му́ч%^Mе PastPass_нн_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_4b_Impи_Lxc
св_4b?_Impи_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_end_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_4b_Lxc
св_4b?_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_end_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_4b_буд._1_ед._затрудн._Lxc
: св_нп_4b_буд._1_ед._затрудн._Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_2_end_1_ед._затрудн. ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Mё PastPass_нн_end_Lxc ;
