src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
проходить:прохо́д нсв_4c "weight: 4.32325587319414" ;
кормить:ко́рм нсв_4c "weight: 3.3699823080207487" ;
доить:до́ нсв_4c_Impи "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ;
поить:по́ нсв_4c_Impи "weight: 2.0824293861648746" ;
стелить:сте́л нсв_4c_15 "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ;
стелиться:сте́л нсв_4c_15_R "weight: 1.9411002333684055" ;
возиться:во́з нсв_4c_R "weight: 2.489914712743143" ;
доиться:до́ нсв_4c_R_Impи ;
разноситься:разно́с нсв_4c_R "weight: 2.2250968897336065" ;
пилить:пи́л нсв_4c4 "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
чертить:че́рт нсв_4c4 "weight: 2.0312768637174936" ;
лепиться:ле́п нсв_4c4_R "weight: 1.9063381271091935" ;
сушиться:су́ш нсв_4c4_R "weight: 1.9732849167398068" ;
ценить:це́н нсв_4c47 "weight: 3.065202984190364" ;
мирить:ми́р нсв_4c7 "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
хвалить:хва́л нсв_4c[4] "weight: 2.149376175795488" ;
учить:у́ч нсв_4c[4] "weight: 2.9701716813156636" ;
лупиться:лу́п нсв_4c[4]_R "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
душиться:ду́ш нсв_4c[4]_R ;
делить:де́л нсв_4c[4]7 "weight: 2.9638774482179753" ;
дразнить:дра́зн нсв_4c[4]7 "weight: 2.526126885397588" ;
бесить:бе́с нсв_4c[4]s "weight: 2.383459381828856" ;
манить:ма́н нсв_4c[7] "weight: 2.746234973437643" ;
доходить:дохо́д нсв_нп_4c "weight: 3.3599112600540666" ;
восходить:восхо́д нсв_нп_4c "weight: 3.6038580650499794" ;
дружить:дру́ж нсв_нп_4c[4] "weight: 2.345670820939456" ;
тужить:ту́ж нсв_нп_4c[4] "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
пересмолиться:пересмол св_4b_R ;
отдоиться:отдо́ св_4b_R_Impи ;
зароиться:заро́ св_4b_R_Impи ;
размориться:размор св_4b_R ;
переубедиться:переубед св_4b_R_буд._1_ед._затрудн. ;
разубедиться:разубед св_4b_R_буд._1_ед._затрудн. "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
убедить:убе%^D св_4b_буд._1_ед._затрудн. "weight: 4.023333066101542" ;
переубедить:переубе%^D св_4b_буд._1_ед._затрудн. "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
загромоздить:загромо св_4b_здить_прич._страд._-жд- "weight: 2.598008892703713" ;
нагромоздить:нагромо св_4b_здить_прич._страд._-жд- "weight: 2.1695795618837748" ;
споить:спо́ св_4b8_Impи "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
откроить:откро́ св_4b8_Impи "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
нагатить:нага́т св_4b8 ;
докрошить:докро́ш св_4b8 ;
отчудить:отчуд св_4b?_буд._1_ед._затрудн. "weight: 2.9542616794263763" ;
погромить:погро́м св_4b[8] ;
раздвоить:раздво́ св_4b[8]_Impи "weight: 2.9701716813156636" ;
строить:стро́ св_4b[8]_Impи "weight: 3.1216231072231615" ;
зазолотить:зазоло́т св_4b[8] ;
наскоблить:наско́бл св_4c ;
вспоить:вспо́ св_4c_Impи "weight: 2.0032481401172504" ;
поизносить:поизно́с св_4c ;
исстелить:иссте́л св_4c_15 ;
устелиться:усте́л св_4c_15_R ;
отдоиться:отдо́ св_4c_R_Impи ;
обсушиться:обсу́ш св_4c_R ;
очутиться:очу́т св_4c_R_буд._1_ед._затрудн. "weight: 2.489914712743143" ;
поместить:поме́ст св_4c7 "weight: 4.127534945932271" ;
перемутить:перему́т св_4c? ;
проронить:проро́н св_4c[7] "weight: 2.0312768637174936" ;
надымить:надым св_нп_4b "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
зафрантить:зафрант св_нп_4b ;
ступить:сту́п св_нп_4c "weight: 2.3953586051285636" ;
казнить:казн св-нсв_4b "weight: 3.5611561675999557" ;
полонить:полон св-нсв_4b "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
родить:ро%^D св-нсв_4b/c_(в_св)_и_4b_(в_нсв) "weight: 4.233015280379205" ;
родиться:род св-нсв_4b/c''_(прош._м_роди/лся/)_(в_св)_и_4b_(в_нсв)_R "weight: 3.9477308122674186" ;
креститься:кре́ст св-нсв_4c_R "weight: 2.242130229032387" ;
женить:же́н св-нсв_4c4 ;
жениться:же́н св-нсв_4c4_R "weight: 2.534727057159505" ;
крестить:кре́ст св-нсв_4c7 "weight: 3.080009912041462" ;
LEXICON LexicalizedParticiple
обветрить:обве́тр св_4a_Lxc "weight: 2.997418596456526" ;
принудить:прину́%^D св_4a7_Lxc "weight: 3.5706666457899985" ;
испортить:испо́рт св_4a[2]_Lxc "weight: 3.954909396894542" ;
сморщить:смо́рщ св_4a[3]_Lxc "weight: 1.7302468680535124" ;
осведомить:осве́дом св_4a[3][7]_Lxc "weight: 3.698729816607447" ;
затаить:зата́ св_4b_Impи_Lxc "weight: 3.009000469006341" ;
склонить:склон св_4b_Lxc "weight: 3.2387765870247986" ;
убедить:убе%^D св_4b_буд._1_ед._затрудн._Lxc "weight: 4.023333066101542" ;
измучить:из св_4a_-мучить_Lxc "weight: 3.7158978417444612" ;
ранить:ра́н св-нсв_4a_Lxc "weight: 4.238776587024798" ;
